Utah statutes.
53-3-505.5.   Behind-the-wheel training requirements.

(1)  Except as provided under Subsection (2), a driver education course under this part or Title 53A, Chapter 13, Part 2, Driver Education Classes that is used to satisfy the driver training requirement under Section 53-3-204 shall require each student to complete at least six hours of behind-the-wheel driving a dual-control motor vehicle with a certified instructor seated in the front seat next to the student driver.

(2)  Up to three hours of the behind-the-wheel driving may be substituted as follows:

(a)  two hours of range driving on an approved driving range under Section 53A-13-201 equals one hour of the behind-the-wheel driving required under Subsection (1);

(b)  two hours of driving simulation practice on a driving simulation device that is fully interactive as set forth in rules made under Section 53-3-505, equals one hour of the behind-the-wheel driving required under Subsection (1); and

(c)  four hours of driving simulation practice on a driving simulation device that is not fully interactive as set forth in rules made under Section 53-3-505, equals one hour of the behind-the-wheel driving required under Subsection (1), with a maximum of one hour of the behind-the-wheel driving required under Subsection (1) that may be substituted under this Subsection (2)(c).

(3)  The behind-the-wheel driving required under Subsection (1) shall include, if feasible, driving on interstate and other multilane highways.

